Florida, session 2026, SB710.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 29 30 Section 1.âParagraph (n) of subsection (3) of section 31 489.105, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 32 489.105âDefinitions.âAs used in this part: 33 (3)ââContractorâ means the person who is qualified for, and 34 is only responsible for, the project contracted for and means, 35 except as exempted in this part, the person who, for 36 compensation, undertakes to, submits a bid to, or does himself 37 or herself or by others construct, repair, alter, remodel, add 38 to, demolish, subtract from, or improve any building or 39 structure, including related improvements to real estate, for 40 others or for resale to others; and whose job scope is 41 substantially similar to the job scope described in one of the 42 paragraphs of this subsection. For the purposes of regulation 43 under this part, the term âdemolishâ applies only to demolition 44 of steel tanks more than 50 feet in height; towers more than 50 45 feet in height; other structures more than 50 feet in height; 46 and all buildings or residences. Contractors are subdivided into 47 two divisions, Division I, consisting of those contractors 48 defined in paragraphs (a)-(c), and Division II, consisting of 49 those contractors defined in paragraphs (d)-(q): 50 (n)ââUnderground utility and excavation contractorâ means a 51 contractor whose services are limited to the construction, 52 installation, and repair, on public or private property, whether 53 accomplished through open excavations or through other means, 54 including, but not limited to, directional drilling, auger 55 boring, jacking and boring, trenchless technologies, wet and dry 56 taps, grouting, and slip lining, of main sanitary sewer 57 collection systems, main water distribution systems, storm sewer 58 collection systems, and the continuation of utility lines from 59 the main systems to a point of termination up to and including 60 the meter location for the individual occupancy, sewer 61 collection systems at property line on residential or single 62 occupancy commercial properties, or on multioccupancy properties 63 at manhole or wye lateral extended to an invert elevation as 64 engineered to accommodate future building sewers, water 65 distribution systems, or storm sewer collection systems at storm 66 sewer structures. However, an underground utility and excavation 67 contractor may install empty underground conduits in rights-of 68 way, easements, platted rights-of-way in new site development, 69 and sleeves for parking lot crossings no smaller than 2 inches 70 in diameter if each conduit system installed is designed by a 71 licensed professional engineer or an authorized employee of a 72 municipality, county, or public utility and the installation of 73 such conduit does not include installation of any conductor 74 wiring or connection to an energized electrical system. An 75 underground utility and excavation contractor may not install 76 piping that is an integral part of a fire protection system as 77 defined in s. 633.102 only up to a beginning at the point within 78 5 feet of the building for which such system will be installed, 79 terminating at a valve, but may not install such piping inside 80 the building where the piping is used exclusively for such 81 system. 82 Section 2.âPresent subsections (33), (34), and (35) of 83 section 633.102, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 84 subsections (34), (35), and (36), respectively, a new subsection 85 (33) is added to that section, and subsection (3) of that 86 section is amended, to read: 87 633.102âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 88 (3)(a)ââContractor Iâ means a contractor whose business 89 includes the execution of contracts requiring the ability to lay 90 out, fabricate, install, inspect, alter, repair, and service all 91 types of fire protection systems, excluding preengineered 92 systems. 93 (b)ââContractor IIâ means a contractor whose business is 94 limited to the execution of contracts requiring the ability to 95 lay out, fabricate, install, inspect, alter, repair, and service 96 water sprinkler systems, water spray systems, foam-water 97 sprinkler systems, foam-water spray systems, standpipes, 98 combination standpipes and sprinkler risers, all piping that is 99 an integral part of the system beginning at the point of service 100 as defined in this section, sprinkler tank heaters, air lines, 101 thermal systems used in connection with sprinklers, and tanks 102 and pumps connected thereto, excluding preengineered systems. 103 (c)ââContractor IIIâ means a contractor whose business is 104 limited to the execution of contracts requiring the ability to 105 fabricate, install, inspect, alter, repair, and service carbon 106 dioxide systems, foam extinguishing systems, dry chemical 107 systems, and Halon and other chemical systems, excluding 108 preengineered systems. 109 (d)ââContractor IVâ means a contractor whose business is 110 limited to the execution of contracts requiring the ability to 111 lay out, fabricate, install, inspect, alter, repair, and service 112 automatic fire sprinkler systems for detached one-family 113 dwellings, detached two-family dwellings, and mobile homes, 114 excluding preengineered systems and excluding single-family 115 homes in cluster units, such as apartments, condominiums, and 116 assisted living facilities or any building that is connected to 117 other dwellings. A Contractor IV is limited to the scope of 118 practice specified in NFPA 13D. 119 (e)ââContractor Vâ means a contractor whose business is 120 limited to the execution of contracts requiring the ability to 121 fabricate, install, alter, repair, and service the underground 122 piping for a fire protection system using water as the 123 extinguishing agent beginning at the point of service as defined 124 in this act and ending no more than 1 foot above the finished 125 floor. A Contractor V may inspect underground piping for a 126 water-based fire protection system under the direction of a 127 Contractor I or Contractor II. 128 129 This subsection may not be construed to include engineers or 130 architects within the defined terms and does not limit or 131 prohibit a licensed fire protection engineer or architect with 132 fire protection design experience from designing any type of 133 fire protection system. A distinction is made between system 134 design concepts prepared by the design professional and system 135 layout as defined in this section and typically prepared by the 136 contractor. However, a person certified under this chapter as a 137 Contractor I or Contractor II may design new fire protection 138 systems of 49 or fewer sprinklers; may design the alteration of 139 an existing fire sprinkler system if the alteration consists of 140 the relocation, addition, or deletion of 49 or fewer sprinklers, 141 notwithstanding the size of the existing fire sprinkler system; 142 and may design the alteration of an existing fire sprinkler 143 system if the alteration consists of the relocation or deletion 144 of 249 or fewer sprinklers and the addition of up to 49 145 sprinklers, as long as the cumulative total number of fire 146 sprinklers being added, relocated, or deleted does not exceed 147 249, notwithstanding the size of the existing fire sprinkler 148 system, if there is no change of occupancy of the affected 149 areas, as defined in the Florida Building Code and the Florida 150 Fire Prevention Code, and there is no change in the water demand 151 as defined in NFPA 13, âStandard for the Installation of 152 Sprinkler Systems,â and if the occupancy hazard classification 153 as defined in NFPA 13 is reduced or remains the same as a result 154 of the alteration. Conflicts between the Florida Building Code 155 and the Florida Fire Prevention Code shall be resolved pursuant 156 to s. 553.73(1)(d). A person certified as a Contractor I, 157 Contractor II, or Contractor IV may design a new fire protection 158 system or design the alteration of an existing fire protection 159 system, the scope of which complies with NFPA 13D, âStandard for 160 the Installation of Sprinkler Systems in One- and Two-Family 161 Dwellings and Manufactured Homes,â as adopted by the State Fire 162 Marshal, notwithstanding the number of fire sprinklers. 163 Contractor-developed plans may not be required by any local 164 permitting authority to be sealed by a registered professional 165 engineer. An underground utility and excavation contractor may 166 fabricate, install, alter, repair, and service the underground 167 piping for a fire protection system using water as the 168 extinguishing agent up to a point within 5 feet of the building 169 for which the fire protection system will be installed, 170 terminating at a valve, but may not install such piping inside 171 the building. 172 (33)ââUnderground utility and excavation contractorâ means 173 an individual who holds a current and valid license as described 174 under s. 489.105(3)(n). 175 Section 3.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 176 made by this act to section 489.105, Florida Statutes, in a 177 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 178 489.107, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 179 489.107âConstruction Industry Licensing Board.â 180 (4)âThe board shall be divided into two divisions, Division 181 I and Division II. 182 (b)âDivision II is comprised of the roofing contractor, 183 sheet metal contractor, air-conditioning contractor, mechanical 184 contractor, pool contractor, plumbing contractor, and 185 underground utility and excavation contractor members of the 186 board; one of the members appointed pursuant to paragraph 187 (2)(j); and one of the members appointed pursuant to paragraph 188 (2)(k). Division II has jurisdiction over the regulation of 189 contractors defined in s. 489.105(3)(d)-(p). 190 Section 4.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 191 made by this act to section 489.105, Florida Statutes, in a 192 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 489.113, Florida 193 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 194 489.113âQualifications for practice; restrictions.â 195 (2)âA person must be certified or registered in order to 196 engage in the business of contracting in this state. However, 197 for purposes of complying with the provisions of this chapter, a 198 subcontractor who is not certified or registered may perform 199 construction work under the supervision of a person who is 200 certified or registered, provided that the work is within the 201 scope of the supervising contractorâs license, the supervising 202 contractor is responsible for the work, and the subcontractor 203 being supervised is not engaged in construction work that would 204 require a license as a contractor under any of the categories 205 listed in s. 489.105(3)(d)-(o). This subsection does not affect 206 the application of any local construction licensing ordinances. 207 To enforce this subsection: 208 (a)âThe department shall issue a cease and desist order to 209 prohibit any person from engaging in the business of contracting 210 who does not hold the required certification or registration for 211 the work being performed under this part. For the purpose of 212 enforcing a cease and desist order, the department may file a 213 proceeding in the name of the state seeking issuance of an 214 injunction or a writ of mandamus against any person who violates 215 any provision of such order. 216 (b)âA county, municipality, or local licensing board 217 created by special act may issue a cease and desist order to 218 prohibit any person from engaging in the business of contracting 219 who does not hold the required certification or registration for 220 the work being performed under this part. 221 Section 5.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 222 made by this act to section 489.105, Florida Statutes, in 223 references thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (1), paragraphs 224 (a) and (b) of subsection (2), and paragraphs (a), (d), and (e) 225 of subsection (4) of section 489.117, Florida Statutes, are 226 reenacted to read: 227 489.117âRegistration; specialty contractors.â 228 (1)(a)âA person engaged in the business of a contractor as 229 defined in s. 489.105(3)(a)-(o) must be registered before 230 engaging in business as a contractor in this state, unless he or 231 she is certified. Except as provided in paragraph (2)(b), to be 232 initially registered, the applicant must submit the required fee 233 and file evidence of successful compliance with the local 234 examination and licensing requirements, if any, in the area for 235 which registration is desired. An examination is not required 236 for registration. 237 (2)(a)âExcept as provided in paragraph (b), the board may 238 not issue a new registration after July 1, 1993, based on any 239 certificate of competency or license for a category of 240 contractor defined in s. 489.105(3)(a)-(o) which is issued by a 241 municipal or county government that does not exercise 242 disciplinary control and oversight over such locally licensed 243 contractors, including forwarding a recommended order in each 244 action to the board as provided in s. 489.131(7). For purposes 245 of this subsection and s. 489.131(10), the board shall determine 246 the adequacy of such disciplinary control by reviewing the local 247 governmentâs ability to process and investigate complaints and 248 to take disciplinary action against locally licensed 249 contractors. 250 (b)âThe board shall issue a registration to an eligible 251 applicant to engage in the business of a contractor in a 252 specified local jurisdiction, provided each of the following 253 conditions are satisfied: 254 1.âThe applicant held, in any local jurisdiction in this 255 state during 2021, 2022, or 2023, a certificate of registration 256 issued by the state or a local license issued by a local 257 jurisdiction to perform work in a category of contractor defined 258 in s. 489.105(3)(a)-(o). 259 2.âThe applicant submits all of the following to the board: 260 a.âEvidence of the certificate of registration or local 261 license held by the applicant as required by subparagraph 1. 262 b.âEvidence that the specified local jurisdiction does not 263 have a license type available for the category of work for which 264 the applicant was issued a certificate of registration or local 265 license during 2021, 2022, or 2023, such as a notification on 266 the website of the local jurisdiction or an e-mail or letter 267 from the office of the local building official or local building 268 department stating that such license type is not available in 269 that local jurisdiction. 270 c.âEvidence that the applicant has submitted the required 271 fee. 272 d.âEvidence of compliance with the insurance and financial 273 responsibility requirements of s. 489.115(5). 274 275 An examination is not required for an applicant seeking a 276 registration under this paragraph. 277 (4)(a)1.âA person whose job scope does not substantially 278 correspond to either the job scope of one of the contractor 279 categories defined in s. 489.105(3)(a)-(o), or the job scope of 280 one of the certified specialty contractor categories established 281 by board rule, is not required to register with the board. A 282 local government, as defined in s. 163.211, may not require a 283 person to obtain a license, issued by the local government or 284 the state, for a job scope which does not substantially 285 correspond to the job scope of one of the contractor categories 286 defined in s. 489.105(3)(a)-(o) and (q) or authorized in s. 287 489.1455(1), or the job scope of one of the certified specialty 288 contractor categories established pursuant to s. 489.113(6). A 289 local government may not require a state or local license to 290 obtain a permit for such job scopes. For purposes of this 291 section, job scopes for which a local government may not require 292 a license include, but are not limited to, painting; flooring; 293 cabinetry; interior remodeling when the scope of the project 294 does not include a task for which a state license is required; 295 driveway or tennis court installation; handyman services; 296 decorative stone, tile, marble, granite, or terrazzo 297 installation; plastering; pressure washing; stuccoing; caulking; 298 and canvas awning and ornamental iron installation. 299 2.âA county that includes an area designated as an area of 300 critical state concern under s. 380.05 may offer a license for 301 any job scope which requires a contractor license under this 302 part if the county imposed such a licensing requirement before 303 January 1, 2021. 304 3.âA local government may continue to offer a license for 305 veneer, including aluminum or vinyl gutters, siding, soffit, or 306 fascia; rooftop painting, coating, and cleaning above three 307 stories in height; or fence installation and erection if the 308 local government imposed such a licensing requirement before 309 January 1, 2021. 310 4.âA local government may not require a license as a 311 prerequisite to submit a bid for public works projects if the 312 work to be performed does not require a license under general 313 law. 314 (d)âAny person who is not required to obtain registration 315 or certification pursuant to s. 489.105(3)(d)-(o) may perform 316 contracting services for the construction, remodeling, repair, 317 or improvement of single-family residences, including a 318 townhouse as defined in the Florida Building Code, without 319 obtaining a local license if such person is under the 320 supervision of a certified or registered general, building, or 321 residential contractor. As used in this paragraph, supervision 322 shall not be deemed to require the existence of a direct 323 contract between the certified or registered general, building, 324 or residential contractor and the person performing specialty 325 contracting services. 326 (e)âAny person who is not certified or registered may 327 perform the work of a specialty contractor whose scope of 328 practice is limited to the type of work specified under s. 329 489.105(3)(j), (k), or (l) for the construction, remodeling, 330 repair, or improvement of commercial or residential swimming 331 pools, interactive water features as defined in the Florida 332 Building Code, hot tubs, and spas without obtaining a local 333 license or certification as a specialty contractor if he or she 334 is supervised by a contractor who is certified or registered 335 under s. 489.105(3)(j), (k), or (l); the work is within the 336 scope of the supervising contractorâs license; the supervising 337 contractor is responsible for the work; and the work does not 338 require certification or registration under s. 489.105(3)(d) 339 (i), (m)-(o), or s. 489.505. Such supervision does not require a 340 direct contract between the contractor certified or registered 341 under s. 489.105(3)(j), (k), or (l) and the person performing 342 the work, or for the person performing the work to be an 343 employee of the contractor certified or registered under s. 344 489.105(3)(j), (k), or (l). This paragraph does not limit the 345 exemptions provided in s. 489.103 and may not be construed to 346 expand the scope of a contractor certified or registered under 347 s. 489.105(3)(j), (k), or (l) to provide plumbing or electrical 348 services for which certification or registration is required by 349 this part or part II. 350 Section 6.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 351 made by this act to section 489.105, Florida Statutes, in a 352 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 489.118, Florida 353 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 354 489.118âCertification of registered contractors; 355 grandfathering provisions.âThe board shall, upon receipt of a 356 completed application and appropriate fee, issue a certificate 357 in the appropriate category to any contractor registered under 358 this part who makes application to the board and can show that 359 he or she meets each of the following requirements: 360 (1)âCurrently holds a valid registered local license in one 361 of the contractor categories defined in s. 489.105(3)(a)-(p). 362 Section 7.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 363 made by this act to section 489.105, Florida Statutes, in a 364 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 489.126, Florida 365 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 366 489.126âMoneys received by contractors.â 367 (1)âFor purposes of this section, the term âcontractorâ 368 includes all definitions as set forth in s. 489.105(3), and any 369 person performing or contracting or promising to perform work 370 described therein, without regard to the licensure of the 371 person. 372 Section 8.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 373 made by this act to section 489.105, Florida Statutes, in a 374 reference thereto, subsections (10) and (11) of section 489.131, 375 Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read: 376 489.131âApplicability.â 377 (10)âNo municipal or county government may issue any 378 certificate of competency or license for any contractor defined 379 in s. 489.105(3)(a)-(o) after July 1, 1993, unless such local 380 government exercises disciplinary control and oversight over 381 such locally licensed contractors, including forwarding a 382 recommended order in each action to the board as provided in 383 subsection (7). Each local board that licenses and disciplines 384 contractors must have at least two consumer representatives on 385 that board. If the board has seven or more members, at least 386 three of those members must be consumer representatives. The 387 consumer representative may be any resident of the local 388 jurisdiction who is not, and has never been, a member or 389 practitioner of a profession regulated by the board or a member 390 of any closely related profession. 391 (11)âAny municipal or county government which enters or has 392 in place a reciprocal agreement which accepts a certificate of 393 competency or license issued by another municipal or county 394 government in lieu of its own certificate of competency or 395 license allowing contractors defined in s. 489.105(3)(a)-(o), 396 shall file a certified copy of such agreement with the board not 397 later than 60 days after July 1, 1993, or 30 days after the 398 effective date of such agreement. 399 Section 9.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 400 made by this act to section 489.105, Florida Statutes, in a 401 reference thereto, paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of section 402 489.1402, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 403 489.1402âHomeownersâ Construction Recovery Fund; 404 definitions.â 405 (1)âThe following definitions apply to ss. 489.140-489.144: 406 (d)ââContractorâ means a Division I or Division II 407 contractor performing his or her respective services described 408 in s. 489.105(3). 409 Section 10.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 410 made by this act to section 633.102, Florida Statutes, in a 411 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 633.224, Florida 412 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 413 633.224âAutomatic fire sprinkler systems for one-family 414 dwellings, two-family dwellings, and mobile homes.â 415 (1)âIt is unlawful for a person to engage in the business 416 or act in the capacity of a contractor of automatic fire 417 sprinkler systems for one-family dwellings, two-family 418 dwellings, and mobile homes without having been duly certified 419 and holding a current certificate as a Contractor I, Contractor 420 II, or Contractor IV as defined in s. 633.102. 421 Section 11.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 422 made by this act to section 633.102, Florida Statutes, in a 423 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 424 633.318, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 425 633.318âCertificate application and issuance; permit 426 issuance; examination and investigation of applicant.â 427 (2)(a)âExaminations shall be administered by the division 428 and held at times and places within the state as the division 429 determines, but there shall be at least two examinations a year. 430 Each applicant shall take and pass an objective, written 431 examination of her or his fitness for a certificate in the class 432 for which the application is requested. There shall be a type of 433 examination for each class of certificate for contractors as 434 defined in s. 633.102. The examination must test the applicantâs 435 ability to lay out, fabricate, install, alter, repair, and 436 inspect fire protection systems and their appurtenances and must 437 test the applicantâs fitness in business and financial 438 management. The test must be based on applicable standards of 439 the National Fire Protection Association and on relevant Florida 440 and federal laws pertaining to the construction industry, safety 441 standards, administrative procedures, and pertinent technical 442 data. 443 Section 12.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.